Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6190YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2271 Section 1. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph f, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 f. Two sequential units of one world language, which 3 may include American sign language. The world language 4 instruction shall not alter the world language to incorporate 5 gender-neutral language if the world language being offered and 6 taught utilizes a grammatical gender system. 7 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, Code 8 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 9 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) The educational standards 10 established in section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âfâ , 11 related to the prohibition against incorporating gender-neutral 12 language into world language instruction if the world language 13 being taught utilizes a grammatical gender system. 14 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0s. Be subject to and comply with the 17 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph 18 âfâ , relating to the prohibition against incorporating 19 gender-neutral language into world language instruction if 20 the world language being taught utilizes a grammatical gender 21 system in the same manner as a school district. 22